Utah statutes.
62A-4a-122.   Review of state policies affecting parents and children.

(1)  Before the 2013 General Session of the Utah Legislature, the Judiciary, Law Enforcement, and Criminal Justice Interim Committee shall study and make findings on the status of and need for action regarding:

(a)  the Legislative Auditor's report, dated January 2011, and whether:

(i)  the rise in the budget for the Division of Child and Family Services from $45 million to nearly $160 million per year is:

(A)  prudent;

(B)  in the best interest of the state; and

(C)  consistent with the state's values and public policy; and

(ii)  the 19 recommendations for better practice should be implemented;

(b)  whether federal law and funding is interfering with the full achievement of state policy regarding parental rights and family unification;

(c)  the potential to seek a jury trial in juvenile court when faced with potential termination of parental rights;

(d)  appellate review following a termination of parental rights by a juvenile court;

(e)  the fairness of fixed timelines and potential for premature findings that can result in a permanent loss of parental rights;

(f)  allowing increased opportunity for extended family members to help resolve parental deficiencies in their family without state interference, or loss of a child from the entire family;

(g)  whether the division should:

(i)  be designated as an authorized lead entity and redirect its current focus and practices in relation to federal law and the receipt of federal funding to strengthen families and prevent child abuse under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 5116; and

(ii)  reduce the number of cases and costs associated with foster care, which is approximately $47,000 per child, in comparison with in-home services, which cost approximately $1,700 per child, and focus on the strong public policy of fostering family unification to the fullest extent possible and as described in the January 2011 legislative audit;

(h)  the full, balanced consideration and application of the principles and protections recognized and provided in state law constitutes the best interest of a child.

(2)  The division shall provide the interim committee with:

(a)  copies of annual reports and state plans; and

(b)  communications regarding child protection that have been provided to or received from the federal government, and which may affect levels of federal funding and current practices of the state.

(3)  The interim committee may request additional information from the division, as necessary to fulfill the requirements of this section.

